Hawaii statutes.
[§339D-7.5] Manufacturer and agent
responsibilities; regulatory compliance. Each electronic device
manufacturer and television manufacturer shall be responsible for ensuring that
the manufacturer and its agents follow all federal, state, and local regulations
when collecting, transporting, and recycling covered electronic devices or
covered televisions, and adopt environmentally sound recycling practices for
the covered electronic devices or covered televisions. [L 2009, c 183, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next